Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.060

Supplemental estimates.

Supplemental estimates shall show the estimated increase or decrease in the total quantities of each class, in the unit cost of each class, in the total cost for each class and in the total cost of the work as shown by the original estimate, together with any change in the time limit and in the estimated dates of commencing and completing the work.

[ 1923 c 183 s 5; RRS s 10322-5.]